incubator/apertium-lat/apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="un/us__num">
        <e><p><l>us</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īus</l>             <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōs</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōrum</l>            <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>am</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īus</l>             <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ā</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ae</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ās</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ārum</l>            <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īus</l>             <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ī</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ō</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l>               <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ōrum</l>            <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>īs</l>              <r>us<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Pronouns -->  
      
    <pardef n="/ego__prn">
        <e><p><l>ego</l>          <r>ego<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>mei</l>          <r>ego<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>mihi</l>         <r>ego<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>me</l>           <r>ego<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>me</l>           <r>ego<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ego</l>          <r>ego<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>meus</l>         <r>ego<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="ill/e__prn">
        <e><p><l>e</l>            <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>us</l>           <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l>            <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>um</l>           <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>o</l>            <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <!-- Adverbs -->  
      
    <pardef n="clar/e__adv">
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ius</l>       <r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>issime</l>    <r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <!-- Determiners -->  
      
    <pardef n="magis__det">
      <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Toponyms -->  
      
    <pardef n="Rom/a__np">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ae</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ae</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>am</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ae</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>   

    <!-- Prepositions -->  
    <pardef n="ab__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="et__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ut__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quasi__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>que</l>
          <r><j/>que<s n="enc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="prae"><i>prae</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="adversus"><i>adversus</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="apud"><i>apud</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circa"><i>circa</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circum"><i>circum</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="citra"><i>citra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="contra"><i>contra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cum"><i>cum</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ex"><i>ex</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gratia"><i>gratia</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="infra"><i>infra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="intra"><i>intra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="procul"><i>procul</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sine"><i>sine</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="trans"><i>trans</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="et"><i>et</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ac"><i>ac</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="atque"><i>atque</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aut"><i>aut</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nec"><i>nec</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="neque"><i>neque</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vel"><i>vel</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cur"><i>cur</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="donec"><i>donec</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etiamsi"><i>etiamsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etsi"><i>etsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nisi"><i>nisi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nonne"><i>nonne</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="posteaquam"><i>posteaquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="postquam"><i>postquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="praeterquam"><i>praeterquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="priusquam"><i>priusquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quamvis"><i>quamvis</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quando"><i>quando</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quia"><i>quia</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sicut"><i>sicut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ut"><i>ut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aliquamdiu"><i>aliquamdiu</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amplius"><i>amplius</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="audacter"><i>audacter</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cito"><i>cito</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ecce"><i>ecce</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gradatim"><i>gradatim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="immo"><i>immo</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ita"><i>ita</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mox"><i>mox</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="numquam"><i>numquam</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="praeterea"><i>praeterea</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="prius"><i>prius</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quippe"><i>quippe</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="semper"><i>semper</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="falso"><i>falso</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="universe"><i>universe</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="verumptamen"><i>verumptamen</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="libenter"><i>libenter</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="unus"><i>un</i><par n="un/us__num"/></e>
    <e lm="clare"><i>clar</i><par n="clar/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ego"><i></i><par n="/ego__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ille"><i>ill</i><par n="ill/e__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="magis"><i>magis</i><par n="magis__det"/></e>
    <e lm="maxime"><i>maxime</i><par n="magis__det"/></e>
    <e lm="Roma"><i>Rom</i><par n="Rom/a__np"/></e>
